Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.604.902

Transitional provisions.

If a school service provider entered into a signed, written contract with an educational institution or teacher before July 1, 2016, the school service provider is not liable for the requirements of RCW 28A.604.010 through 28A.604.050 with respect to that contract until the next renewal date of the contract.

[ 2015 c 277 s 9.]